Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB76.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 371.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If, in any contract in the amount of two million[five hundred thousand] dollars ($2,000,000)[($500,000)] or
more involving the improvement of real estate, a certain amount or percentage of the contract is held back by
the owner, that retained amount shall be deposited in a separate escrow account with a bank or trust company
authorized to do business in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(2) As of the time of the deposit of the retained funds, they shall become the sole and separate property of the
contractor to whom they are owed.
(3) The escrow agent shall promptly invest all escrowed principal in obligations selected by the escrow agent in its
discretion.
(4) Upon satisfactory completion of the contract, to be evidenced by a written release by the owner, all funds
accumulated in the escrow account, together with any interest thereon, shall be paid immediately to the
contractor to whom it is owed.
(5) The escrow agent shall be compensated for its services in an amount agreed to by the owner, contractor, and
escrow agent. The compensation shall be a commercially reasonable fee commensurate with fees being
charged for handling of escrow accounts of similar size and duration. The compensation shall be paid from the
escrow account.
(6) In the event the owner fails or refuses to execute the release provided for in subsection (4) of this section, then
the contractor shall have a cause of action against the owner in a court of proper jurisdiction.
(7) This section shall not apply to contracts with the Commonwealth, any city, county, charter county
government, urban-county government, unified local government, or consolidated local
government[municipality], [or ]any other political subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of the
Commonwealth, or school boards.
Section 2. KRS 371.405 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All payments on construction contracts entered into after June 26, 2007, shall be made pursuant to the terms of
the contract and as required in this section and KRS 371.410.
(2) The following provisions in a contract for construction shall be against the public policy of this
Commonwealth and shall be void and unenforceable:
(a) A provision that purports to waive, release, or extinguish the right to resolve disputes through litigation
in court or substantive or procedural rights in connection with such litigation, except that a contract may
require binding arbitration as a substitute for litigation or require nonbinding alternative dispute
resolution as a prerequisite to litigation;
(b) A provision that purports to waive, release, or extinguish rights provided by KRS Chapter 376, with the
exception of partial waivers of lien rights provided by the contractor or subcontractor for progress
payments;[ or]
(c) A provision that purports to waive, release, or extinguish any of the requirements of Section 1 of this
Act; or
(d) A provision that purports to waive, release, or extinguish the right of a contractor or subcontractor to
recover costs, additional time, or damages, or obtain an equitable adjustment of the contract, for delays
in performing the contract that are, in whole or part, within the control of the contracting entity.
Unusually bad weather that cannot be reasonably anticipated, fire, or other act of God shall not
automatically entitle the contractor to additional compensation under this paragraph.
(3) Subsection (2)(d)[(c)] of this section shall not render null, void, and unenforceable a contract provision that:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) Permits a contractor or subcontractor to recover that portion of delay costs caused by acts or omissions
of the contracting entity;
(b) Requires notice of any delay by the party affected by the delay;
(c) Provides for reasonable liquidated damages;
(d) Provides for arbitration or any other procedure designed to resolve contract disputes; or
(e) Specifies which costs are recoverable by a contractor or subcontractor for delay.
(4) If a provision of a construction contract is found to be null and unenforceable, that provision shall not affect
other provisions of the contract that are in compliance with this section and, to this end, the provisions of the
contract are severable.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, all contracts for construction shall provide that payment of
amounts due a contractor from a contracting entity, except retainage, shall be made within thirty (30) business
days after the contracting entity receives a timely, properly completed, undisputed request for payment.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, if the contracting entity fails to pay a contractor within
thirty (30) business days following receipt of a timely, properly completed, undisputed request for payment,
the contracting entity shall pay interest to the contractor beginning on the thirty-first business day after receipt
of the request for payment, computed at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum on the unpaid amount.
Twenty-five (25) business days following the submission of a timely, properly completed, undisputed request
for payment, the contractor shall notify the contracting entity by certified mail if payment has not been
received. The notice shall also include the date on which interest shall begin to accrue.
(7) For purposes of subsections (5) and (6) of this section, a postsecondary institution and a board of education
shall have forty-five (45) business days to make the payment required by those subsections. For purposes of
payments by a board of education, the Department of Education shall have ten (10) business days, including
the day the undisputed request for payment is received, to complete the final approval and application for
payment and return it to the board of education. The ten (10) business days shall be included in the forty-five
(45) business days. If the contracting entity fails to pay a contractor within forty-five (45) business days after
receipt of the timely, properly completed, undisputed request for payment, the contracting entity shall,
beginning on the forty-sixth day after receipt of the request, pay interest to the contractor computed at the rate
of twelve percent (12%) per annum on the unpaid amount.
(8) A contractor shall pay its subcontractors any undisputed amounts due within fifteen (15) business days of
receipt of payment from the contracting entity, including payment of retainage if retainage is released by the
contracting entity, if the subcontractor has provided a timely, properly completed, and undisputed request for
payment to the contractor.
(9) If a contractor fails to pay a subcontractor any undisputed amounts due within fifteen (15) business days of
receipt of payment from the contracting entity, the contractor shall pay interest to the subcontractor beginning
on the sixteenth business day after receipt of payment by the contractor, computed at the rate of twelve percent
(12%) per annum on the unpaid amount.
(10) Subsections (8) and (9) of this section shall apply to all payments from subcontractors to their subcontractors.
Signed by Governor April 2, 2025.